Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Volunteer fire and rescue workers. new text end new text begin (a) A taxpayer who was a volunteer rescue worker is allowed a subtraction of $10,000. A married taxpayer filing a joint return is allowed a subtraction of $20,000 if both spouses were volunteer rescue workers. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "full-time basis" means working in a given occupation for 1,600 hours or more during a calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) "qualified rescue work" means work as: new text end new text begin (i) a volunteer firefighter, as defined in section 299N.03, subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (ii) ambulance service personnel, as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a; new text end new text begin (iii) an emergency medical responder, as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 6; or new text end new text begin (iv) a member of a volunteer canine search and rescue team or volunteer underwater search and rescue team; and new text end new text begin (3) "volunteer rescue worker" means an individual who performed at least 40 hours of qualified rescue work during the taxable year on a volunteer, part-time, or paid-on-call basis, but not on a full-time basis. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end